language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 134 Y 33
SFX 134 0 ach .
SFX 134 0 achmej .
SFX 134 0 achmy .
SFX 134 0 achu .
SFX 134 0 ašo .
SFX 134 0 aštej .
SFX 134 0 ašćo .
SFX 134 0 e .
SFX 134 0 ech .
SFX 134 0 echmej .
SFX 134 0 echmy .
SFX 134 0 echu .
SFX 134 0 ešo .
SFX 134 0 eštej .
SFX 134 0 ešćo .
SFX 134 0 i .
SFX 134 0 im .
SFX 134 0 imej .
SFX 134 0 imy .
SFX 134 0 itej .
SFX 134 0 iśo .
SFX 134 0 iš .
SFX 134 0 mej .
SFX 134 0 my .
SFX 134 0 o .
SFX 134 0 om .
SFX 134 0 omej .
SFX 134 0 omy .
SFX 134 0 otej .
SFX 134 0 ośo .
SFX 134 0 oš .
SFX 134 0 tej .
SFX 134 0 ćo .
SFX 135 Y 24
SFX 135 0 a .
SFX 135 0 ach .
SFX 135 0 am .
SFX 135 0 ami .
SFX 135 0 i .
SFX 135 0 ijo .
SFX 135 0 ijom .
SFX 135 0 ijomej .
SFX 135 0 ijomy .
SFX 135 0 ijotej .
SFX 135 0 ijośo .
SFX 135 0 ijoš .
SFX 135 0 iju .
SFX 135 0 im .
SFX 135 0 imej .
SFX 135 0 imy .
SFX 135 0 itej .
SFX 135 0 iśo .
SFX 135 0 iš .
SFX 135 0 oma .
SFX 135 0 ow .
SFX 135 0 owu .
SFX 135 0 u .
SFX 135 0 y .
SFX 136 Y 2
SFX 136 0 oma .
SFX 136 0 owu .
SFX 137 Y 3
SFX 137 0 ej .
SFX 137 0 eju .
SFX 137 0 yma .
SFX 138 Y 4
SFX 138 0 o .
SFX 138 0 och .
SFX 138 0 om .
SFX 138 0 omi .
SFX 139 Y 22
SFX 139 0 a .
SFX 139 0 ach .
SFX 139 0 am .
SFX 139 0 ami .
SFX 139 0 i .
SFX 139 0 ijo .
SFX 139 0 ijom .
SFX 139 0 ijomej .
SFX 139 0 ijomy .
SFX 139 0 ijotej .
SFX 139 0 ijośo .
SFX 139 0 ijoš .
SFX 139 0 iju .
SFX 139 0 imej .
SFX 139 0 imy .
SFX 139 0 itej .
SFX 139 0 iśo .
SFX 139 0 oma .
SFX 139 0 ow .
SFX 139 0 owu .
SFX 139 0 u .
SFX 139 0 y .
SFX 140 Y 20
SFX 140 0 ach .
SFX 140 0 am .
SFX 140 0 ami .
SFX 140 0 i .
SFX 140 0 ijo .
SFX 140 0 ijom .
SFX 140 0 ijomej .
SFX 140 0 ijomy .
SFX 140 0 ijotej .
SFX 140 0 ijośo .
SFX 140 0 ijoš .
SFX 140 0 iju .
SFX 140 0 imej .
SFX 140 0 imy .
SFX 140 0 itej .
SFX 140 0 iśo .
SFX 140 0 oma .
SFX 140 0 ow .
SFX 140 0 owu .
SFX 140 0 u .
SFX 141 Y 26
SFX 141 0 e .
SFX 141 0 ech .
SFX 141 0 echmej .
SFX 141 0 echmy .
SFX 141 0 echu .
SFX 141 0 eštej .
SFX 141 0 ešćo .
SFX 141 0 mej .
SFX 141 0 my .
SFX 141 0 o .
SFX 141 0 om .
SFX 141 0 omej .
SFX 141 0 omy .
SFX 141 0 otej .
SFX 141 0 ośo .
SFX 141 0 oš .
SFX 141 0 tej .
SFX 141 0 yjo .
SFX 141 0 yjom .
SFX 141 0 yjomej .
SFX 141 0 yjomy .
SFX 141 0 yjotej .
SFX 141 0 yjośo .
SFX 141 0 yjoš .
SFX 141 0 yju .
SFX 141 0 ćo .
SFX 142 Y 3
SFX 142 0 owu .
SFX 142 0 y .
SFX 142 0 yma .
SFX 143 Y 4
SFX 143 0 e .
SFX 143 0 owu .
SFX 143 0 y .
SFX 143 0 yma .
SFX 144 Y 5
SFX 144 0 im .
SFX 144 0 og .
SFX 144 0 ogo .
SFX 144 0 om .
SFX 144 0 omu .
SFX 145 Y 4
SFX 145 0 mej .
SFX 145 0 my .
SFX 145 0 tej .
SFX 145 0 ćo .
SFX 146 Y 4
SFX 146 0 mej .
SFX 146 0 my .
SFX 146 0 tej .
SFX 146 0 śo .
SFX 147 Y 6
SFX 147 0 m .
SFX 147 0 mej .
SFX 147 0 my .
SFX 147 0 tej .
SFX 147 0 śo .
SFX 147 0 š .
SFX 148 Y 7
SFX 148 0 e .
SFX 148 0 m .
SFX 148 0 mej .
SFX 148 0 my .
SFX 148 0 tej .
SFX 148 0 śo .
SFX 148 0 š .
SFX 149 Y 7
SFX 149 0 mej .
SFX 149 0 my .
SFX 149 0 om .
SFX 149 0 tej .
SFX 149 0 u .
SFX 149 0 y .
SFX 149 0 ćo .
SFX 150 Y 8
SFX 150 0 e .
SFX 150 0 mej .
SFX 150 0 my .
SFX 150 0 om .
SFX 150 0 tej .
SFX 150 0 u .
SFX 150 0 y .
SFX 150 0 ćo .
SFX 151 Y 4
SFX 151 0 e .
SFX 151 0 ych .
SFX 151 0 ym .
SFX 151 0 ymi .
SFX 152 Y 17
SFX 152 0 a .
SFX 152 0 ach .
SFX 152 0 am .
SFX 152 0 ami .
SFX 152 0 e .
SFX 152 0 eju .
SFX 152 0 o .
SFX 152 0 om .
SFX 152 0 oma .
SFX 152 0 omej .
SFX 152 0 omy .
SFX 152 0 otej .
SFX 152 0 ow .
SFX 152 0 owu .
SFX 152 0 ośo .
SFX 152 0 oš .
SFX 152 0 u .
SFX 153 Y 22
SFX 153 0 a .
SFX 153 0 ach .
SFX 153 0 achmej .
SFX 153 0 achmy .
SFX 153 0 achu .
SFX 153 0 am .
SFX 153 0 ami .
SFX 153 0 ašo .
SFX 153 0 aštej .
SFX 153 0 ašćo .
SFX 153 0 e .
SFX 153 0 i .
SFX 153 0 m .
SFX 153 0 mej .
SFX 153 0 my .
SFX 153 0 oma .
SFX 153 0 ow .
SFX 153 0 owu .
SFX 153 0 tej .
SFX 153 0 u .
SFX 153 0 śo .
SFX 153 0 š .
SFX 154 Y 22
SFX 154 0 ach .
SFX 154 0 am .
SFX 154 0 ami .
SFX 154 0 e .
SFX 154 0 ech .
SFX 154 0 echmej .
SFX 154 0 echmy .
SFX 154 0 echu .
SFX 154 0 eštej .
SFX 154 0 ešćo .
SFX 154 0 i .
SFX 154 0 o .
SFX 154 0 om .
SFX 154 0 oma .
SFX 154 0 omej .
SFX 154 0 omy .
SFX 154 0 otej .
SFX 154 0 ow .
SFX 154 0 owu .
SFX 154 0 ośo .
SFX 154 0 oš .
SFX 154 0 u .
SFX 155 Y 23
SFX 155 0 a .
SFX 155 0 ach .
SFX 155 0 am .
SFX 155 0 ami .
SFX 155 0 e .
SFX 155 0 eg .
SFX 155 0 ego .
SFX 155 0 ej .
SFX 155 0 eje .
SFX 155 0 eju .
SFX 155 0 em .
SFX 155 0 emu .
SFX 155 0 oju .
SFX 155 0 om .
SFX 155 0 oma .
SFX 155 0 ow .
SFX 155 0 owu .
SFX 155 0 u .
SFX 155 0 y .
SFX 155 0 ych .
SFX 155 0 ym .
SFX 155 0 yma .
SFX 155 0 ymi .
SFX 156 Y 24
SFX 156 0 a .
SFX 156 0 ach .
SFX 156 0 am .
SFX 156 0 ami .
SFX 156 0 e .
SFX 156 0 eg .
SFX 156 0 ego .
SFX 156 0 ej .
SFX 156 0 eje .
SFX 156 0 eju .
SFX 156 0 em .
SFX 156 0 emu .
SFX 156 0 i .
SFX 156 0 oju .
SFX 156 0 om .
SFX 156 0 oma .
SFX 156 0 ow .
SFX 156 0 owu .
SFX 156 0 u .
SFX 156 0 y .
SFX 156 0 ych .
SFX 156 0 ym .
SFX 156 0 yma .
SFX 156 0 ymi .
SFX 157 Y 24
SFX 157 0 a .
SFX 157 0 ach .
SFX 157 0 am .
SFX 157 0 ami .
SFX 157 0 e .
SFX 157 0 eg .
SFX 157 0 ego .
SFX 157 0 ej .
SFX 157 0 eje .
SFX 157 0 eju .
SFX 157 0 em .
SFX 157 0 emu .
SFX 157 0 o .
SFX 157 0 oju .
SFX 157 0 om .
SFX 157 0 oma .
SFX 157 0 ow .
SFX 157 0 owu .
SFX 157 0 u .
SFX 157 0 y .
SFX 157 0 ych .
SFX 157 0 ym .
SFX 157 0 yma .
SFX 157 0 ymi .
SFX 158 Y 24
SFX 158 0 a .
SFX 158 0 ach .
SFX 158 0 am .
SFX 158 0 ami .
SFX 158 0 e .
SFX 158 0 eg .
SFX 158 0 ego .
SFX 158 0 ej .
SFX 158 0 eje .
SFX 158 0 eju .
SFX 158 0 em .
SFX 158 0 emu .
SFX 158 0 o .
SFX 158 0 oju .
SFX 158 0 om .
SFX 158 0 oma .
SFX 158 0 ow .
SFX 158 0 owu .
SFX 158 0 u .
SFX 158 0 y .
SFX 158 0 ych .
SFX 158 0 ym .
SFX 158 0 yma .
SFX 158 0 ymi .
SFX 159 Y 17
SFX 159 0 a .
SFX 159 0 ach .
SFX 159 0 am .
SFX 159 0 ami .
SFX 159 0 e .
SFX 159 0 o .
SFX 159 0 oju .
SFX 159 0 om .
SFX 159 0 oma .
SFX 159 0 omej .
SFX 159 0 omy .
SFX 159 0 otej .
SFX 159 0 ow .
SFX 159 0 owu .
SFX 159 0 ośo .
SFX 159 0 oš .
SFX 159 0 u .
SFX 160 Y 17
SFX 160 0 a .
SFX 160 0 ach .
SFX 160 0 am .
SFX 160 0 ami .
SFX 160 0 e .
SFX 160 0 o .
SFX 160 0 oju .
SFX 160 0 om .
SFX 160 0 oma .
SFX 160 0 omej .
SFX 160 0 omy .
SFX 160 0 otej .
SFX 160 0 ow .
SFX 160 0 owu .
SFX 160 0 ośo .
SFX 160 0 oš .
SFX 160 0 u .
SFX 161 Y 25
SFX 161 0 a .
SFX 161 0 ach .
SFX 161 0 am .
SFX 161 0 ami .
SFX 161 0 e .
SFX 161 0 eg .
SFX 161 0 ego .
SFX 161 0 ej .
SFX 161 0 eje .
SFX 161 0 eju .
SFX 161 0 em .
SFX 161 0 emu .
SFX 161 0 i .
SFX 161 0 im .
SFX 161 0 oju .
SFX 161 0 om .
SFX 161 0 oma .
SFX 161 0 ow .
SFX 161 0 owu .
SFX 161 0 u .
SFX 161 0 y .
SFX 161 0 ych .
SFX 161 0 ym .
SFX 161 0 yma .
SFX 161 0 ymi .
SFX 162 Y 21
SFX 162 0 ach .
SFX 162 0 achmej .
SFX 162 0 achmy .
SFX 162 0 achu .
SFX 162 0 ašo .
SFX 162 0 aštej .
SFX 162 0 ašćo .
SFX 162 0 e .
SFX 162 0 i .
SFX 162 0 im .
SFX 162 0 imej .
SFX 162 0 imy .
SFX 162 0 itej .
SFX 162 0 iśo .
SFX 162 0 iš .
SFX 162 0 m .
SFX 162 0 mej .
SFX 162 0 my .
SFX 162 0 tej .
SFX 162 0 śo .
SFX 162 0 š .
SFX 163 Y 19
SFX 163 0 ach .
SFX 163 0 achmej .
SFX 163 0 achmy .
SFX 163 0 achu .
SFX 163 0 ašo .
SFX 163 0 aštej .
SFX 163 0 ašćo .
SFX 163 0 e .
SFX 163 0 i .
SFX 163 0 im .
SFX 163 0 imej .
SFX 163 0 imy .
SFX 163 0 itej .
SFX 163 0 iśo .
SFX 163 0 iš .
SFX 163 0 mej .
SFX 163 0 my .
SFX 163 0 tej .
SFX 163 0 śo .
SFX 164 Y 19
SFX 164 0 ach .
SFX 164 0 achmej .
SFX 164 0 achmy .
SFX 164 0 achu .
SFX 164 0 ašo .
SFX 164 0 aštej .
SFX 164 0 ašćo .
SFX 164 0 e .
SFX 164 0 i .
SFX 164 0 im .
SFX 164 0 imej .
SFX 164 0 imy .
SFX 164 0 itej .
SFX 164 0 iśo .
SFX 164 0 iš .
SFX 164 0 mej .
SFX 164 0 my .
SFX 164 0 tej .
SFX 164 0 ćo .
