language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Balkow/155
Bogow/155
Bóž/157
Bělow/155
Jamn/157
Jankow/155
Jurow/155
Kanow/155
Kuš/155
Mokr/157
Rakow/155
awtochton/155
bit/155
bjakan/161
blaban/161
blaran/161
brošn/157
byt/155
bytś/164
byzan/161
běl/163
celaźin/155
cerwjaś/164
chachan/161
chlump/146
chrjochan/161
chwal/163
chójź/164
dej/148
dobój/148
domysl/140
dopowěz/145
dopśeměŕ/146
doros/145
dostoj/148
dowez/145
dowěr/1,135
dozjěz/145
drjewjan/155
drosć/164
drozn/155
drěm/146
dut/155
embargow/155
filigran/155
gjagotan/161
gnercan/161
gnil/163
gnězdź/164
grakan/161
gramoś/164
grat/155
gwězdn/157
gój/162
głaź/164
głosol/163
gływuš/1,143
hympol/163
jebj/1,159
jětś/164
kaj/160
kal/163
kašlan/161
kisal/163
kisał/157
kjachan/161
kjagotan/161
kjawcan/161
kjawkan/161
klakan/161
kliń/146
klěcan/161
komuź/164
kontow/155
kopol/163
krad/155
kukan/161
kulowaś/164
kwakan/161
kósćej/160
kłoś/164
kšaj/160
lan/155
laš/155
lěbgoź/164
lětan/161
ma/147
maskulin/155
maskulinum/155
mjakotan/161
mjatł/157
mjawkan/161
mroj/153
myt/157
mócń/146
mórź/164
městn/157
nabój/148
nacet/155
najěz/145
naknap/146
naměstn/157
naros/145
nastoj/148
našćip/146
nik/1,144
njama/147
njebombol/163
njebrozdź/164
njebój/148
njeběl/163
njeběź/164
njebłazń/146
njecerwjaś/164
njechmjel/163
njechwal/163
njechójź/164
njechłoź/164
njedar/1,135
njedej/148
njedobój/148
njedogóń/146
njedojěz/145
njedoros/145
njedostoj/148
njedowěr/1,135
njedozežeŕ/146
njedozjěz/145
njedrosć/164
njegjarź/164
njegnil/163
njegněźdź/164
njegroź/164
njegój/162
njegól/163
njegóńtwaŕ/146
njegóź/164
njegłosol/163
njehympol/163
njejašć/164
njejs/1,149
njekabej/163
njekal/163
njekaź/164
njekisal/163
njeklij/163
njekobjel/163
njekokul/163
njekopol/163
njekołowroś/164
njekral/163
njekringel/163
njekružel/163
njekumpań/146
njekuźel/163
njekwantś/164
njekśiwź/164
njelěbgoź/164
njemanźel/163
njemokś/164
njemól/163
njeměń/146
njemłoś/164
njenabój/148
njenajěz/145
njenamjeń/146
njenastoj/148
njenawěz/145
njenaźeŕ/146
njepal/163
njepleś/134
njepokuś/164
njepopjel/163
njepuź/164
njepóbjeŕ/146
njepóbój/148
njepódros/145
njepódstoj/148
njepógib/146
njepóros/145
njepóslobrań/146
njepóstoj/148
njepóśěń/146
njepěź/164
njepśebój/148
njepśedstoj/148
njepśedłyp/146
njepśejěz/145
njepśemóž/141
njepśestoj/148
njepśetwaŕ/146
njepśijěz/145
njepśikumpań/146
njepśiros/145
njepśistoj/148
njepšaw/157
njerozgriwaś/164
njerozjěz/145
njerozměŕ/146
njerozros/145
njerozstoj/148
njesmól/163
njesokol/163
njespisowaśel/163
njespěšń/146
njestarosć/164
njestoj/148
njesłoź/164
njetrětol/163
njewez/145
njewobros/145
njewobruń/146
njewobstoj/148
njewowez/145
njewubój/148
njewudrěm/146
njewumóž/141
njewupowěz/145
njewustoj/148
njewutwóŕ/146
njewuwez/145
njewuź/164
njewólenj/1,152
njewótgrěb/146
njewótjěz/145
njewótros/145
njewótstoj/148
njewěz/145
njezabój/148
njezadań/146
njezapowěz/145
njezastoj/148
njezawez/145
njezazwóń/146
njezdrjal/163
njezestoj/148
njezjadnosć/140
njeznaŕ/146
njezros/145
njezybol/163
njełaskosć/164
nješpingel/163
nježwal/163
nježwałź/164
nježydń/146
nuchan/161
o-nog/1,136
pasat/155
platow/155
plěch/155
prumsan/161
pyskan/161
póbyt/155
póbój/148
póddan/161
pódros/145
pódstoj/148
pódwóc/1,142
pókap/146
pókšyt/155
pólej/160
pówětšon/155
póśich/1,158
późaseśoŕ/146
płoś/164
pśebój/148
pśedpowěz/145
pśedstoj/148
pśemóž/141
pśeros/145
pśestoj/148
pśeškrab/146
pśipowěz/145
pśistarjejš/1,151
pśistoj/148
pśiswójźb/1,139
pšaw/157
rikan/161
rolow/155
rozežeń/146
rozjěz/145
rozros/145
rozstoj/148
s/150
sedymj/1,138
set/155
silow/155
sknap/146
skokan/161
skokotan/161
slěź/164
smal/163
smarcan/161
snochtan/161
sobuźěl/163
sochan/161
spinat/155
stanj/1,159
star/155
stat/155
stoj/148
stojan/161
stolětn/157
styrj/1,138
suseźin/155
suweren/155
swět/155
swětł/157
swěź/164
słon/156
słuchan/161
tretol/163
twór/1,135
tšulan/161
tšuran/161
tšut/155
wez/145
wjelican/161
wob/137
wobgrab/146
wobmysl/140
wobros/145
wobstoj/148
wokol/163
wopłoń/146
wowez/145
wubój/148
wuchow/155
wukšaj/160
wumóž/141
wupowěz/145
wuscyń/146
wustoj/148
wusć/164
wutor/1,135
wuwez/145
wólej/160
wólenj/1,152
wóstanj/1,152
wósymj/1,138
wótbroń/146
wótjěz/145
wótmysl/140
wótros/145
wótstoj/148
wótš/1,158
wózn/157
wóšćěŕ/146
wětš/155
zabój/148
zajěz/145
zaros/145
zastoj/148
zawaŕ/146
zaśich/1,158
zemjan/155
zestoj/148
zjadnosć/140
zjěz/145
zmachń/146
zrosć/154
zybol/163
zł/1,158
złot/157
łaskosć/164
śich/1,158
śopł/157
škrjon/157
šybał/155
šćipan/161
šćokan/161
žurń/146
žwal/163
žyt/157
